Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 3 Conditions of Detention Generally

42-5-50.
Transmittal of information on convicted persons; place of detention; payment for inmates not transferred to the custody of the department; notice in the event of convicted person free on bond pending appeal.

The clerk of the court shall notify the commissioner of a sentence within 30 working days following the receipt of the sentence and send other documents set forth in this Code section. Such notice shall be submitted electronically and shall contain the following documents:

A certified copy of the sentence;

A complete history of the convicted person, including a certified copy of the indictment, accusation, or both and such other information as the commissioner may require;

An affidavit of the custodian of such person indicating the total number of days the convicted person was incarcerated prior to the imposition of the sentence. It shall be the duty of the custodian of such person to transmit the affidavit provided for in this paragraph to the clerk of the superior court within ten days following the date on which the sentence is imposed;

Order of probation revocation or tolling of probation; and

A copy of the sentencing information report is required in all jurisdictions with an options system day reporting center certified by the Department of Community Supervision. The failure to provide the sentencing information report shall not cause an increase in the 15 day time period for the department to assign the inmate to a correctional institution as set forth in subsection (b) of this Code section.

All of the aforementioned documents shall be submitted on forms provided by the commissioner. The commissioner shall file one copy of each such document with the State Board of Pardons and Paroles within 30 working days of receipt of such documents from the clerk of the court. Except where the clerk is on a salary, the clerk shall receive from funds of the county the fee prescribed in Code Section 15-6-77 for such service.

Within 15 days after the receipt of the information provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, the commissioner shall assign the convicted person to a correctional institution designated by the commissioner in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 42-5-51. It shall be the financial responsibility of the correctional institution to provide for the picking up and transportation, under guard, of the inmate to the inmate’s assigned place of detention. If the inmate is assigned to a county correctional institution or other county facility, the county shall assume such duty and responsibility.

The state shall pay for each such inmate not transferred to the custody of the department from a county facility the per diem rate specified by subsection (c) of Code Section 42-5-51 for each day the inmate remains in the custody of the county after the department receives the notice provided by subsection (a) of this Code section.

In the event that the convicted person is free on bond pending the appeal of his or her conviction, the notice provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be transmitted to the commissioner until all appeals of such conviction have been disposed of or until the bond shall be revoked.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 13; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1399, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1098, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1364, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1990, p. 565, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 42; Ga. L. 1998, p. 194, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 775, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 214, § 17/HB 567; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 7-5/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 42/HB 79; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-71/HB 310.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “submitted electronically and shall contain” for “mailed within such time period by first-class mail and shall be accompanied by two complete and certified sentence packages containing” in the second sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a); substituted “department” for “Department of Corrections” at the end of the first sentence in paragraph (a)(5); and substituted “documents shall” for “documents will” in the first sentence of the ending undesignated paragraph following paragraph (a)(5). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language at the end of the last sentence of
paragraph (a)(5).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Community Supervision” for “department” in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(5). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Imposition of sentence generally, §

17-10-1

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-5-51.
Jurisdiction over certain misdemeanor offenders; designation of place of confinement of inmates; reimbursement of county; transfer of inmates to federal authority.

The department shall have no authority, jurisdiction, or responsibility with respect to misdemeanor offenders sentenced under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 17-10-3 to confinement in the county or other jail, county correctional institution, or such other places as counties may provide for maintenance of county inmates. The county wherein the sentence is imposed shall have the sole responsibility of executing the sentence and of providing for the care, maintenance, and upkeep of the inmate while serving such sentence; provided, however, that, where the sentencing judge certifies to the department that the county facilities of that county are inadequate for maintaining female inmates, any female inmate may be committed to the department to serve her sentence in a state correctional institution, as may be directed by the department; provided, further, that the delivery of the female inmates to the proper place of incarceration shall be at the expense of the county of conviction.

Where any person is convicted of any offense, misdemeanor, or felony and sentenced to serve time in any penal institution in this state other than as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, he shall be committed to the custody of the commissioner who, with the approval of the board, shall designate the place of confinement where the sentence shall be served.

After proper documentation is received from the clerk of the court, the department shall have 15 days to transfer an inmate under sentence to the place of confinement. If the inmate is not transferred within the 15 days, the department shall reimburse the county, in a sum not less than $7.50 per day per inmate and in such an amount as may be appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly, for the cost of the incarceration, commencing 15 days after proper documentation is received by the department from the clerk of the court; provided, however, that, subject to an appropriation of funds, local governing authorities that have entered into memorandums of understanding or agreement or that demonstrate continuous attempts to enter into memorandums of understanding or agreement with the federal government under Section 287(g) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act shall receive an additional payment in the amount of 10 percent of the established rate paid for reimbursement for the confinement of state inmates in local confinement facilities. The reimbursement provisions of this Code section shall only apply to payment for the incarceration of felony inmates available for transfer to the department, except inmates under death sentence awaiting transfer after their initial trial, and shall not apply to inmates who were incarcerated under the custody of the commissioner at the time they were returned to the county jail for trial on additional charges or returned to the county jail for any other purposes, including for the purpose of a new trial.

Notwithstanding any language in the sentence as passed by the court, the commissioner may designate as a place of confinement any available, suitable, and appropriate state or county correctional institution in this state operated under the jurisdiction or supervision of the department. The commissioner shall also have sole authority to transfer inmates from one state or county correctional institution in this state to any other such institution operated by or under the jurisdiction or supervision of or approved by the board. Neither male nor female state inmates shall be assigned to serve in any manner in a county jail unless they are participating in a state sponsored project and have the approval of the commissioner and the sheriff or the jail administrator of the county. Furthermore, the commissioner may transfer to the Attorney General of the United States for confinement any inmate if it is determined that the custody, care, treatment, training, or rehabilitation of the inmate has not been adequate or in the best interest of the inmate or his fellow inmates. The commissioner is authorized to contract with the Attorney General of the United States for the custody, care, subsistence, housing, treatment, training, and rehabilitation of such inmates.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 13; Ga. L. 1964, p. 489, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1399, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 582, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1297, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 376, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1434, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1364, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 604, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 14/HB 87.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 1/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 21/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(a) If any provision or part of any provision of this Act or the application of the same is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of this Act or any other part of this Act than can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this Act are severable.

“(b) The terms of this Act regarding immigration shall be construed to have the meanings consistent with such terms under federal immigration law.

“(c) The provisions of this Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws governing immigration and civil rights.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 22/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to offenses and violations occurring on or after July 1, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 35 (2011).

42-5-51.1.
Retention of inmate in state penal institution pending trial on offense committed while in confinement.

When an inmate of the state penal system is charged with a misdemeanor or felony alleged to have been committed by such inmate within the confines of a state correctional institution and has been denied bond relating to such charge, the sheriff of the county in which such charge is pending may request that such inmate remain in the custody of the department after the sentence for which the department has jurisdiction over the inmate has been served and until adjudication of such charge. The commissioner, in consultation with the warden or superintendent of the institution where such inmate is housed, shall make a determination regarding the retention of custody and shall notify such sheriff of his or her determination within 36 hours of such request. In making such a determination, the commissioner shall consider the space available in the institution, the potential safety benefits of retaining such inmate, and any other factors he or she deems relevant for making such determination.

No request pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be considered by the commissioner unless the inmate is housed in an institution located in the county in which the offense is alleged to have occurred.

No inmate who remains in a state correctional institution pursuant to a request granted under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be transferred to a correctional institution located outside the county which made such request unless the commissioner determines such transfer is necessary for the inmate’s physical or mental health.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-51.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 478, § 1/SB 301.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

42-5-52.
Classification and separation of inmates generally; placement of juvenile offenders and of females; transfer of mentally diseased, alcoholic, drug addicted, or tubercular inmates.

The department shall provide for the classification and separation of inmates with respect to age, first offenders, habitual criminals and incorrigibles, diseased inmates, mentally diseased inmates, and those having contagious, infectious, and incurable diseases. Incorrigible inmates in county correctional institutions shall be returned to the department at the request of the proper county authority.

The department may establish separate correctional or similar institutions for the separation and care of juvenile offenders. The commissioner may transfer any juvenile under 17 years of age from the penal institution in which he or she is serving to the Department of Juvenile Justice, provided that the transfer is approved thereby. The juvenile may be returned to the custody of the commissioner when the commissioner of juvenile justice determines that the juvenile is unsuited to be dealt with therein. The commissioner may accept a juvenile for transfer into a penal institution upon the request of the commissioner of juvenile justice if such juvenile is 16 years of age or older and has been committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for a class A designated felony act or class B designated felony act, as defined by Code Section 15-11-2, and such juvenile’s behavior presents a substantial danger to any person at or within a Department of Juvenile Justice facility. In the event of such transfer, the department shall have the same authority over and responsibility for such juvenile as the Department of Juvenile Justice has for such juvenile and shall maintain sight and sound separation as set forth in paragraph (5) of subsection (c) of Code Section 15-11-504.

Female inmates shall be removed from proximity to the place of detention for males and shall not be confined in a county correctional institution or other county facility except with the express written approval of the department.

The department is authorized to transfer a mentally diseased inmate from a state or county correctional institution or other facility operating under its authority to a criminal ward or facility of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities. The inmate shall remain in the custody of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities until proper officials of the facility at which the inmate is detained declare that his or her sanity has been restored, at which time the inmate shall be returned to the custody of the department. At any time after completion of his or her sentence, an inmate detained by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities on the grounds that he or she is mentally diseased may petition for release in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3 of Title 37. Prior to completion of his or her sentence, this procedure shall not be available to the inmate.

Upon being presented with a proper certification from the county physician of a county where a person has been sentenced to confinement that the person sentenced is addicted to drugs or alcohol to the extent that the person’s health will be impaired or life endangered if immediate treatment is not rendered, the department shall transfer the inmate to the custody of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities. The inmate shall remain in such custody until officials of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities determine the inmate is able to serve his or her sentence elsewhere.

The department may transfer any inmate afflicted with active tuberculosis from any state or county correctional institution, or any other facility operating under the authority of the department, to a tubercular ward or facility specially provided and maintained for criminals by the department at a tuberculosis facility or facilities operating under the Department of Public Health.

History.

Ga. L. 1897, p. 71, § 8; Penal Code 1910, § 1203; Ga. L. 1931, Ex. Sess., p. 118, §§ 8, 9; Code 1933, §§ 77-317, 77-318, 77-319; Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 14; Ga. L. 1957, p. 477, § 2; Ga. L. 1960, p. 234, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 699, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 42; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 21; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-23/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 2-1/HB 242.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, in subsection (b), inserted “or she” in the second sentence, and added the fourth and fifth sentences. See editor’s note for applicability.

Cross references.

Commitment of juvenile to adult correctional facility prohibited, §

15-11-34

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Law reviews.

For note, “Behind Closed Doors: An Empirical Inquiry Into the Nature of Prison Discipline in Georgia,” see 8 Ga. L. Rev. 919 (1974).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

42-5-52.1.
Submission to HIV test; separate housing for HIV infected persons.

Any term used in this Code section and defined in Code Section 31-22-9.1 shall have the meaning provided for that term in Code Section 31-22-9.1.

Where any person is committed to the custody of the commissioner to serve time in any penal institution of this state on and after July 1, 1988, the department shall require that person to submit to an HIV test within 30 days after the person is so committed unless that person is in such custody because of having committed an AIDS transmitting crime and has already submitted to an HIV test pursuant to Code Section 17-10-15.

No later than December 31, 1991, the department shall require to submit to an HIV test each person who has been committed to the custody of the commissioner to serve time in a penal institution of this state and who remains in such custody, or who would be in such custody but for having been transferred to the custody of the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities) under Code Section 42-5-52, if that person has not submitted to an HIV test following that person’s most recent commitment to the custody of the commissioner and unless that person is in such custody because of having committed an AIDS transmitting crime and has already submitted to an HIV test pursuant to Code Section 17-10-15.

Upon failure of an inmate to cooperate in HIV test procedures under this Code section, the commissioner may apply to the superior court for an order authorizing the use of such measures as are reasonably necessary to require submission to the HIV test. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit the authority of the department to require inmates to submit to an HIV test.

Any person determined by the department to be an HIV infected person, whether or not by the test required by this Code section, should be housed separately at existing institutions from any other persons not infected with HIV if:

That person is reasonably believed to be sexually active while incarcerated;

That person is reasonably believed to be sexually predatory either during or prior to incarceration; or

The commissioner determines that other conditions or circumstances exist indicating that separate confinement would be in the best interest of the department and the inmate population,

but neither the department nor any officials, employees, or agents thereof shall be civilly or criminally liable for failing or refusing to house HIV infected persons separately from any other persons who are not HIV infected persons.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-52.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 9; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-24/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 1799, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“The General Assembly finds that Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) and its causative agent, including Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV), pose a grave threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.
In the absence of any effective vaccination or treatment for this disease, it threatens almost certain death to all who contract it.
The disease is largely transmitted through sexual contacts and intravenous drug use, not through casual contact, and, while deadly, is therefore preventable. The key component of the fight against AIDS is education. Through public education and counseling our citizens can learn how the disease is transmitted and, thus, how to protect themselves and prevent its spread.
The Department of Human Resources is encouraged to continue its efforts to educate all Georgians about the disease, its causative agent, and its means of transmission.
In addition, voluntary testing should be encouraged for anyone who feels at risk of infection. While education, counseling, and voluntary testing are vital to the elimination of this epidemic, other measures are needed to protect the health of our citizens, and it is the intention of the General Assembly to enact such measures in the exercise of its police powers in order to deal with AIDS and HIV infection.”

42-5-52.2.
Testing of prison inmates for HIV; consolidation of inmates testing positive.

For purposes of this Code section, “HIV” means HIV as defined by Code Section 31-22-9.1.

The department shall implement an HIV testing program whereby any state inmate who has been in the custody of a state penal institution for one year or longer and who has not previously tested positive for HIV shall be tested for HIV within 30 days prior to his or her expected date of release from the custody of the department.

Each person tested as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be notified by the department in writing of the results of such testing prior to his or her release. Prior to the release of any person testing positive for HIV, the appropriate information as required by Code Sections 24-12-21 and 31-22-9.2 or other law shall be provided by the department to the Department of Public Health. Prior to the release of any person testing positive for HIV, the department shall also provide to such person in writing contact information regarding medical, educational, and counseling services available through the Department of Public Health. Any person testing positive for HIV shall be provided instruction relating to living with HIV, the prevention of the spread of such virus, and the legal consequences of infecting unknowing partners.

The department shall seek state and federal grants or other possible sources of revenue for the purpose of funding a program of HIV testing authorized by this Code section. In addition, the department is authorized to accept gifts, subject to the approval of the board, for the purpose of funding such program.

The department shall consolidate inmates who have tested positive for HIV in a manner that most efficiently provides education, counseling, and treatment for such persons.

The provisions of this Code section shall not be construed to limit the provision for HIV testing in Code Section 42-9-42.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-52.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 611, § 1/SB 64; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 61/HB 24; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

42-5-53.
Establishment of county correctional institutions; supervision by department; quota of inmates; funding; confinement and withdrawal of inmates.

Subject to the provisions stated in this Code section, any county may purchase, rent, establish, construct, and maintain a county correctional institution for the care and detention of all inmates assigned to it by the department. The county may contract with other counties relative to the joint care, upkeep, and working of the inmates in such counties. Each county may pay its pro rata share of such expenses by taxes assessed and levied as provided by law.

All county correctional institutions established by the counties as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be subject to supervision and control by the department, and the board shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the administration and operation thereof.

Each county establishing a county correctional institution which complies with the rules and requirements established by the board and which is approved by the board shall receive a quota of inmates in accordance with such methods of apportionment as may be established by the board.

The department is authorized, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board, to pay funds, in an amount appropriated by the General Assembly for the purposes specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection, for each state inmate assigned to a county correctional institution to the county operating the facility. The amount so paid shall be determined on the basis of an equal amount per day for each state inmate assigned to the county correctional institution.

Each county is authorized to use the money paid to it pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection for the operation and maintenance of the county correctional institution or may use the money so paid to supplant county funds or previous levels of county funding for the county correctional institution. Following a full hearing, the board is given the authority to withhold payment or withdraw all inmates from any county correctional institution which does not at any time meet or comply with the rules, regulations, and requirements of the board or comply with its directions.

In all cases in which an inmate is the sole responsibility of a county and the board has no authority, jurisdiction, or responsibility with respect to the sentence of the inmate, the county may confine the inmate in a county correctional institution established pursuant to this Code section. Counties without a county correctional institution may contract with counties having a county correctional institution to maintain the inmate.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit the board from withdrawing inmates from any county correctional institution which does not at any time comply with the rules and regulations of the board promulgated pursuant to Code Section 42-5-10 or from withdrawing inmates from any county correctional institution which does not at any time meet the requirements of the board or comply with its directives. For reasons other than the failure to comply with the rules, regulations, requirements, and directives, the board is authorized to withdraw all inmates under its jurisdiction from all county correctional institutions under the following conditions:

That such withdrawal shall include all inmates under the jurisdiction of the board assigned to all county correctional institutions and that the withdrawal shall be completed within one year after the effective date of the beginning of the withdrawal;

That all county correctional institutions shall be notified at least one year in advance of the effective date of the beginning of the withdrawal;

That each county affected by the withdrawal shall have the option of selling or leasing its county correctional institution to the department, provided the House Committee on State Properties and the Senate State Institutions and Property Committee shall certify to the department that the facility is suitable for inmate housing and provided, further, that the sale price of the facility or the lease rental payments for the facility shall be determined by a board of three appraisers selected as follows:

One to be selected by the department;

One to be selected by the governing authority of the county; and

The third to be selected by the other two appraisers;

That each county affected by the withdrawal shall have 30 days from the date of the issuance of the notice required by paragraph (2) of this subsection to notify the department that the facility is to be sold to the department, the facility is to be leased to the department, or the county will keep and maintain the facility for its own use. If the department is not so notified within the time limitation, the department shall be under no obligation to lease or purchase the facility;

That if the county elects to sell or lease the facility, the committees named in paragraph (3) of this subsection shall have 60 days from the time the department is notified of such decision in which to inspect the facility and make its recommendations and certification to the department;

That if any such facility is leased by the department, the term of the lease, the requirements relative to the repair, maintenance, and improvements of the facility by the county, and the requirements relative to the renewal of the lease shall be as agreed upon by the department and the governing authority of the county; and

That the sales price or lease rental payments for each facility and the requirements relative to the lease contract when the facility is leased shall be determined within six months after the issuance of the notice of the effective date of the beginning of the withdrawal required by paragraph (2) of this subsection and that, if they are not determined within the time limitation, the department shall be under no obligation to lease or purchase the facility.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 16; Ga. L. 1964, p. 491, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 318, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 908, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 470, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 42; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 42; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 3/HB 117; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 42/HB 79.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “House Committee on State Properties” for “State Institutions and Property Committee of the House of Representatives” in paragraph (e)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

42-5-54.
Information from inmates relating to medical insurance; provision and payment of medical treatment for inmates.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Detention facility” means a county correctional institution, workcamp, or other county detention facility used for the detention of persons convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor.

“Inmate” means a person who is detained in a detention facility by reason of being convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor and who is insured under existing individual health insurance, group health insurance, or prepaid medical care coverage or is eligible for benefits under Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49, the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977.” Such term does not include any sentenced inmate who is the responsibility of the Department of Corrections.

“Officer in charge” means the warden, captain, or superintendent having the supervision of any detention facility.

The officer in charge or his or her designee may require an inmate to furnish the following information:

The existence of any health insurance, group health plan, or prepaid medical care coverage under which the inmate is insured;

The eligibility for benefits to which the inmate is entitled under Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49, the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977”;

The name and address of the third-party payor; and

The policy or other identifying number.

The officer in charge will provide a sick, injured, or disabled inmate access to medical services and may arrange for the inmate’s health insurance carrier to pay the health care provider for the medical services rendered.

The liability for payment for medical care described under subsection (b) of this Code section may not be construed as requiring payment by any person or entity, except by an inmate personally or by his or her carrier through coverage or benefits described under paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section or by or at the direction of the Department of Community Health pursuant to paragraph (2) of such subsection.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to relieve the governing authority, governmental unit, subdivision, or agency having the physical custody of an inmate from its responsibility to pay for any medical and hospital care rendered to such inmate regardless of whether such individual has been convicted of a crime.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1081, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24.

Editor’s notes.

This former Code section, relating to temporary transfer of convicted persons pending appeals, was based on Ga. L. 1971, p. 341, § 2, and was repealed by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1364, § 3 effective January 1, 1983.

Law reviews.

For review of 1996 legislation relating to jails, see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 269 and 273 (1996).

42-5-55.
Deductions from inmate accounts for payment of certain damages and medical costs; limit on deductions; fee for managing inmate accounts.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Chronic illness” means an illness requiring care and treatment over an extended period of time. Chronic illness includes, but is not limited to, hypertension, diabetes, pulmonary illness, a seizure disorder, acquired immune deficiency syndrome, cancer, tuberculosis B, hepatitis C, rheumatoid arthritis, an autoimmune disorder, and renal disease.

“Detention facility” means a state, county, or private correctional institution, workcamp, or other state or county detention facility used for the detention of persons convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor.

“Inmate” means a person who is detained in a detention facility by reason of being convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor.

“Medical treatment” means each visit initiated by the inmate to an institutional physician; physician’s extender, including a physician assistant or a nurse practitioner; registered nurse; licensed practical nurse; medical assistant; dentist; dental hygienist; optometrist; or psychiatrist for examination or treatment.

“Officer in charge” means the warden, captain, or superintendent having the supervision of any detention facility.

The commissioner or, in the case of a county or private facility, the officer in charge may establish by rules or regulations criteria for a reasonable deduction from money credited to the account of an inmate to:

Repay the costs of:

Public property or private property in the case of an inmate housed in a private correctional facility willfully damaged or destroyed by the inmate during his or her incarceration;

Medical treatment and prescription medication for injuries inflicted by the inmate upon himself or herself or others unless the inmate has a severe mental health designation as determined by the department;

Searching for and apprehending the inmate when he or she escapes or attempts to escape; such costs to be limited to those extraordinary costs incurred as a consequence of the escape; or

Quelling any riot or other disturbance in which the inmate is unlawfully involved; or

Defray the costs paid by the state or county for:

Medical treatment for an inmate when the request for medical treatment has been initiated by the inmate; and

Medication prescribed for the treatment of a medical condition unrelated to pregnancy or a chronic illness.

The provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall in no way relieve the governmental unit, agency, or subdivision having physical custody of an inmate from furnishing him or her with needed medical treatment.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code section, the deductions from money credited to the account of an inmate as authorized under subsection (b) of this Code section shall not be made whenever the balance in the inmate’s account is $10.00 or less.

The officer in charge of any detention facility is authorized to charge a fee for establishing and managing inmate money accounts. Such fee shall not exceed $1.00 per month.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1081, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 252, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 136, § 1/HB 464; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 3/HB 509.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “; or” was added at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(D).

Editor’s notes.

This former Code section, relating to temporary transfer of convicted persons pending appeals and requests by convicted person or his attorney for transfer, was based on Ga. L. 1971, p. 341, § 3, and Ga. L. 1974, p. 479, § 1. This former Code section was repealed by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1364, § 3, effective January 1, 1983.